Maryland, session 2026, HB0485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL Landscape
Architects.
[(g) “Licensed landscape architect” means a landscape architect who is licensed by
the Board to practice landscape architecture.]
[(h)] (G) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Board to allow a partnership or
corporation to operate a business through which an individual may practice landscape
architecture.
[(i)] (H) “Permit fee” means, as applicable, the fee paid in connection with the
issuance and renewal of a permit.
[(j)] (I) (1) “Practice landscape architecture” means:
(i) to provide any service or creative work in the analysis or design
of land and natural resources that requires training and experience in the application of
the biological, physical, mathematical, and social sciences; and
(ii) to perform design coordination of a project or portion of a project
provided that the [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect holds a current license
issued by the Board and has adequate education and experience in, and understanding of,
the project or portion of the project being coordinated.
(2) “Practice landscape architecture” includes:
(i) consultation, research, analysis, assessment, selection, and
allocation of land and natural resources;
(ii) development of graphic, written, digital, and other appropriate
criteria to govern the planning and design of land development and construction programs,
including:
1. preparation, review, and analysis of master plans, site
plans, and land development plans;
2. reconnaissance, planning, design, and preparation of
construction documents;
3. construction, observation, administration, and project
management;
– 3 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. preservation, restoration, conservation, reclamation,
rehabilitation, and management of land and natural resources;
5. preparation of feasibility and site selection studies,
environmental studies, and cost estimate reports; and
6. design and analysis of grading and drainage, irrigation,
erosion and sediment control systems, and pedestrian and vehicular circulation systems;
and
(iii) in conjunction with site plan preparation, the performance of the
following:
1. determining a grade;
2. determining drainage; and
3. preparing and designing stormwater drainage systems
provided that the preparation and design:
A. are in accordance with design manuals, details, and
standards accepted by the State or local authorities; and
B. do not require a hydraulic or structural design of system
components.
(J) “PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT” MEANS A LANDSCAPE
ARCHITECT WHO IS LICENSED BY THE BOARD TO PRACTICE LANDSCAPE
ARCHITECTURE.
Subtitle 2. State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects.
9–201.
There is a State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects in
the Department.
9–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [5] FIVE members.
(2) Of the [5] FIVE members of the Board:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(i) [3] THREE shall be [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape
architects; and
(ii) [2] TWO shall be consumer members.
(3) The Governor shall appoint the members with the advice of the
Secretary and the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) [Each] OF THE PROFESSIONAL landscape architect [member] MEMBERS:
(1) TWO MEMBERS shall be [a licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape
[architect] ARCHITECTS who [has] HAVE practiced landscape architecture in the State for
at least 10 YEARS, WITH 5 years OF EXPERIENCE AS RESPONSIBLE CHARGE; AND
(2) ONE MEMBER SHALL BE A PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT
WHO HAS PRACTICED LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE IN THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 5
YEARS.
9–206.
(a) In addition to any powers set forth elsewhere, the Board may adopt:
(1) any regulation to carry out this title; and
(2) a seal.
(b) In addition to any duties set forth elsewhere, the Board shall keep a record of
its proceedings.
(c) (1) [With the advice of the established landscape architect associations,
the] THE Board shall adopt, by regulation, a code of ethics for practicing landscape
architecture.
(2) The Board shall distribute a copy of the code of ethics:
(i) to each applicant for a license; and
(ii) on each renewal of a license, to each licensee.
(3) In addition to complying with the publication requirements of Title 10,
Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article, the Board shall distribute a copy of any
amendment to the code of ethics to each licensee.
9–206.1.
– 5 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) In this section, “code official” means a public official responsible for the review
of building permit documents or the issuance of building permits.
(b) The Board shall:
(1) keep a list of the names and mailing addresses of all licensees;
(2) provide each code official with:
(I) a copy of the list annually; and
(II) ACCESS TO THE LIST UPON REQUEST; AND
(3) provide any other person who makes a request with a copy of the list at
a reasonable fee set by the Board.
(d) The Board shall distribute:
(1) to each applicant for a license and each code official, a copy of the
Maryland PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects Act and the Board’s [rules and]
regulations;
(2) on each renewal of a license, to each licensee, a copy of any amendments
to the Maryland PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects Act and the Board’s [rules and]
regulations that took effect during the 2–year period ending on the date of renewal; and
(3) to each code official, a copy of any amendments to the Maryland
PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects Act and the Board’s [rules and] regulations.
9–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual shall be licensed by
the Board before the individual may practice landscape architecture in the State.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) an individual who practices landscape architecture while performing
official duties as an employee of the federal government;
(2) an individual while practicing landscape architecture under the
supervision of a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect, if the individual does not
assume responsible charge of design or supervision; or
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(3) an individual while practicing landscape architecture as an employee
of a person who is authorized to practice landscape architecture, if the employee does not
assume responsible charge of design or supervision.
9–302.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall be an individual who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b) An applicant shall be at least 18 years old.
(c) An applicant shall meet the educational and experience requirements under
§ 9–303 of this subtitle.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, the applicant shall pass the
examination [given] REQUIRED by the Board under this subtitle.
9–303.
(a) Before an applicant takes the examination [given] REQUIRED by the Board,
the applicant shall qualify under this section by meeting the educational and experience
requirements set forth in subsection (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this section.
(b) An applicant qualifies under this section if the applicant:
(1) has [been] graduated from a college or school of landscape architecture
that holds accredited status from the national Landscape Architectural Accreditation
Board; and
(2) has at least 2 years of work experience in landscape architecture that
is:
(i) under the responsible charge of a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect or other [authorized individual] LICENSED DESIGN PROFESSIONAL;
and
(ii) otherwise satisfactory to the Board.
(c) An applicant qualifies under this section if the applicant:
(1) has [been] graduated on completion of at least a 4–year curriculum in
a design–related discipline from a college or university that is accredited by, or is a
constituent unit of an institution accredited by, the [Middle States Association of Colleges
and Schools] COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION ACCREDITATION or the equivalent
regional accrediting association of other regional areas; and
– 7 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) has at least 4 years of work experience in landscape architecture that
is:
(i) under the responsible charge of a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect or other [authorized individual] LICENSED DESIGN PROFESSIONAL;
and
(ii) otherwise satisfactory to the Board.
(d) An applicant qualifies under this section if the applicant:
(1) has [been] graduated on completion of at least a 4–year curriculum in
a nondesign–related discipline from a college or university that is accredited by, or is a
constituent unit of an institution accredited by, the [Middle States Association of Colleges
and Schools] COUNCIL FOR HIGHER EDUCATION ACCREDITATION or the equivalent
regional accrediting association of other regional areas; and
(2) has at least 6 years of practical work experience in landscape
architecture that is:
(i) under the responsible charge of a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect or other [authorized individual] LICENSED DESIGN PROFESSIONAL;
and
(ii) otherwise satisfactory to the Board.
(e) (1) An applicant qualifies under this section if the applicant:
(i) is a high school graduate or the equivalent; and
(ii) has at least 8 years of practical work experience in landscape
architecture that is:
1. under the responsible charge of a [licensed]
PROFESSIONAL landscape architect or other [authorized individual] LICENSED DESIGN
PROFESSIONAL; and
2. otherwise satisfactory to the Board.
(2) The Board may count each full year of study at a college or school of
landscape architecture that meets the criteria set forth in subsection (b) of this section as
one of the years of the work experience required under this subsection.
9–304.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
An applicant for a license shall:
(1) submit to the Board an application on the form that the Board provides;
and
(2) pay to the Board [or the Board’s designee:
(i)] a nonrefundable application fee [set by the Board; and
(ii) an examination fee set by the Board in an amount not to exceed
the cost of the required examination].
9–305.
(a) [Except as otherwise provided in § 9–305.1 of this subtitle, an] AN applicant
who otherwise qualifies for a license is entitled to be examined as provided in this section.
(b) The Board PERIODICALLY shall [give written examinations] OFFER THE
EXAMINATIONS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION to qualified applicants at least once a
year at the time and place that the Board determines.
(c) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
THE Board shall give each qualified applicant notice of the time and place of examination.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY USE A TESTING SERVICE TO ADMINISTER THE
EXAMINATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE BOARD USES A TESTING SERVICE TO ADMINISTER
EXAMINATIONS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE TESTING SERVICE, SUBJECT TO THE
REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE BOARD, MAY:
(I) SET THE TIME AND PLACE OF EXAMINATIONS;
(II) SEND QUALIFIED APPLICANTS NOTICE OF THE TIME AND
PLACE OF EXAMINATIONS; AND
(III) PROVIDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE BOARD MAY
REQUIRE THE TESTING SERVICE TO PROVIDE.
(3) IF NECESSARY TO DETERMINE THE COMPETENCY OF
APPLICANTS, THE BOARD MAY USE A TESTING SERVICE TO ADMINISTER
SUPPLEMENTAL EXAMINATIONS WITH ADDITIONAL SUBJECTS.
– 9 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d) (1)] (E) The Board shall determine, by regulation, the subjects, scope,
and form of and the passing score for examinations given under this title.
[(2) The Board shall structure the examination to test the competency of an
applicant to plan, design, and supervise the installation of landscape projects.
(3) The Board may supplement a written examination given under this
section with an oral examination.]
[9–305.1.
(a) The Board may use a testing service to administer the examinations given
under this title.
(b) If the Board uses a testing service under this subsection, the testing service,
subject to the requirements set by the Board, may:
(1) set the time and place of examinations;
(2) give qualified applicants notice of the time and place of examinations;
and
(3) furnish any other information that the Board may require the testing
service to provide.]
9–308.
(a) While a license is in effect, it authorizes the licensee to practice landscape
architecture.
(b) A [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect is not authorized to practice
architecture, engineering, or land surveying.
9–309.
[(a) Unless a license is renewed for a 2–year term as provided in this section, the
license expires on the first June 30 that comes:
(1) after the effective date of the license; and
(2) in an even–numbered year.]
(A) A LICENSE IS VALID FOR A 2–YEAR TERM FROM ISSUANCE OF THE
LICENSE AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(f) (1) The Board shall adopt regulations[:
(1)] to require a licensee to demonstrate continuing professional
competency by completing at least 24 hours of professional development activities as a
condition of renewal of a license under this section[; and
(2) in accordance with the following:
(i) the continuing professional competency requirement does not
apply to the first renewal of a license;
(ii) if a license expires on or before September 30, 2015, a licensee is
not required to fulfill the continuing professional competency requirement;
(iii) if a license expires between October 1, 2015, and September 30,
2016, a licensee is required to fulfill 50% of the continuing professional competency
requirement as provided in regulations adopted by the Board under this subsection; and
(iv) if a license expires on or after October 1, 2016, a licensee is
required to fulfill the full continuing professional competency requirement as provided in
regulations adopted by the Board under this subsection].
(2) THE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL COMPETENCY REQUIREMENT
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE FIRST
RENEWAL OF A LICENSE.
9–309.1.
(A) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE AN EMERITUS STATUS LICENSE TO AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO SUBMITS TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FOR EMERITUS STATUS
ON THE FORM REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE AN EMERITUS STATUS LICENSE IF THE
INDIVIDUAL:
(1) (I) IS CURRENTLY LICENSED BY THE BOARD TO PRACTICE
LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE; OR
(II) WAS PREVIOUSLY LICENSED BY THE BOARD TO PRACTICE
LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE AND ALLOWED THE LICENSE TO EXPIRE BUT IS
OTHERWISE ENTITLED TO RENEWAL UNDER § 9–309 OF THIS SUBTITLE AT THE TIME
OF EXPIRATION;
– 11 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) HAS BEEN A PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT FOR AT
LEAST 25 YEARS, OF WHICH 5 YEARS HAVE BEEN IN THE STATE;
(3) IS NOT THE SUBJECT OF ANY PENDING DISCIPLINARY ACTION
RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE IN THE STATE OR
ANOTHER STATE; AND
(4) PAYS TO THE BOARD A FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
(C) THE HOLDER OF AN EMERITUS STATUS LICENSE UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY USE THE DESIGNATION OF “LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT
EMERITUS”; AND
(2) MAY NOT ENGAGE IN THE PRACTICE OF LANDSCAPE
ARCHITECTURE.
(D) THE BOARD MAY REINSTATE THE LICENSE TO PRACTICE LANDSCAPE
ARCHITECTURE OF THE HOLDER OF AN EMERITUS STATUS LICENSE IF THE
INDIVIDUAL:
(1) SUBMITS TO THE BOARD AN APPLICATION FOR REINSTATEMENT
ON THE FORM PROVIDED BY THE BOARD;
(2) MEETS THE CONTINUING PROFESSIONAL COMPETENCY
REQUIREMENTS FOR RENEWAL OF A LICENSE UNDER § 9–309 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) IS NOT THE SUBJECT OF ANY PENDING DISCIPLINARY ACTION
RELATED TO THE PRACTICE OF LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURE IN THE STATE OR
ANOTHER STATE; AND
(4) PAYS TO THE BOARD A REINSTATEMENT FEE SET BY THE BOARD.
9–310.
(a) (1) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 9–312 of this subtitle, the Board,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, or suspend or revoke a license if:
(i) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a
license for the applicant or licensee or for another;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(ii) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(iii) under the laws of the United States or of any state, the [applicant
or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED is convicted
of:
1. a felony; or
2. a misdemeanor that is directly related to the fitness and
qualification of the applicant or licensee to practice landscape architecture;
(iv) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED is guilty of gross negligence, incompetence, or misconduct
while practicing landscape architecture;
(v) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED has had a license to practice landscape architecture in
another state revoked or suspended by the other state for a cause that would justify
revocation or suspension under this title, except for the failure to pay a license fee;
(vi) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED violates any regulation adopted by the Board; or
(vii) the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED violates any provision of this title.
(2) (i) Instead of or in addition to reprimanding [a licensee] AN
INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED or suspending or
revoking a license under this subsection, the Board may impose a penalty not exceeding
$5,000 for each violation.
(ii) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under this
subsection, the Board shall consider:
1. the seriousness of the violation;
2. the harm caused by the violation;
3. the good faith of the licensee; and
4. any history of previous violations by the licensee.
(3) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under this subsection into
the General Fund of the State.
– 13 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The Board shall consider the following facts in the granting, denial, renewal,
suspension, or revocation of a license or the reprimand of [a licensee] AN INDIVIDUAL
AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED when an applicant or licensee is
convicted of a felony or misdemeanor described in subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section:
(1) the nature of the crime;
(2) the relationship of the crime to the activities authorized by the license;
(3) with respect to a felony, the relevance of the conviction to the fitness
and qualification of the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION
IS CONTEMPLATED to practice landscape architecture;
(4) the length of time since the conviction; and
(5) the behavior and activities of the [applicant or licensee] INDIVIDUAL
AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED before and after the conviction.
9–311.
(b) (1) A complaint shall:
(i) be in writing;
(ii) state specifically the facts on which the complaint is based; and
(iii) be submitted to [the Secretary of] the Board.
(2) If the complaint is made by any person other than a member of the
Board, the complaint shall be made under oath by the person who submits the complaint.
9–314.
(b) (1) If an individual has failed to renew a license for any reason and then
applies to the Board for reinstatement more than 2 years after the license has expired, the
Board may:
(i) require the individual to reapply for a license in the same manner
that an applicant applies for an original license under this subtitle; or
(ii) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, reinstate the license.
(2) The Board may reinstate a license under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, if the individual:
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(i) meets the renewal requirements of § 9–309 of this subtitle,
INCLUDING THE PROFESSIONAL COMPETENCY REQUIREMENTS THAT WOULD HAVE
BEEN REQUIRED FOR RENEWAL OF THE LICENSE;
(ii) if required by the Board, states reasons why reinstatement
should be granted; and
(iii) pays to the Board a reinstatement fee set by the Board.
9–402.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of this subtitle, a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect may practice landscape architecture for others through:
(i) a corporation as an officer, employee, or agent of the corporation;
(ii) a partnership as a partner, an employee, or an agent of the
partnership; or
(iii) a limited liability company as a member, an employee, or an
agent of the limited liability company.
(2) Subject to the provisions of this subtitle, a corporation, partnership, or
limited liability company may provide landscape architectural services through a [licensed]
PROFESSIONAL landscape architect.
(b) A [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect who practices landscape
architecture through a corporation, partnership, or limited liability company under this
subtitle is subject to all of the provisions of this title that relate to practicing landscape
architecture.
9–403.
[(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a] A corporation,
partnership, or limited liability company shall hold a permit issued by the Board before the
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company may operate a business through
which landscape architecture is practiced.
[(b) A corporation, partnership, or limited liability company may provide
landscape architectural services for itself or for an affiliated corporation, partnership, or
limited liability company without a permit issued by the Board.]
9–404.
– 15 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) A corporation, partnership, or limited liability company shall appoint
at least one person in responsible charge of the landscape architectural services performed
or offered to be performed through the corporation, partnership, or limited liability
company.
(2) A person in responsible charge shall be:
(i) in direct control of landscape architectural services performed or
offered to be performed through the corporation, partnership, or limited liability company;
(ii) in a position to act on behalf of, and be responsible for, the
corporation, partnership, or limited liability company in matters related to the practice of
landscape architecture; and
(iii) a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect in good
standing WHO IS LICENSED BY THE BOARD.
(3) A licensee may not be designated as a person in responsible charge for
more than one corporation, partnership, or limited liability company that provides or offers
to provide landscape architectural services without the prior approval of the Board.
9–407.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and while a permit is in effect, it
authorizes the holder to:
(1) operate a business through which a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect practices landscape architecture; and
(2) represent to the public that the business provides the services of a
[licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect.
(b) A permit authorizes the holder to provide a service that constitutes practicing
landscape architecture only if the service is performed by an individual who is licensed or
otherwise authorized to practice landscape architecture under this title.
9–408.
[(a) Unless a permit is renewed for a 2–year term as provided in this section, the
permit expires on the first June 30 that comes:
(1) after the effective date of the permit; and
(2) in an even–numbered year.]
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
(A) A PERMIT IS VALID FOR A 2–YEAR TERM FROM ISSUANCE OF THE
PERMIT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION.
9–410.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 9–411 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a permit to any
applicant, reprimand a permit holder, or suspend or revoke a permit if:
(1) the [applicant or permit holder] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE
ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a
permit; or
(2) the [permit holder] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS
CONTEMPLATED fraudulently or deceptively uses a permit.
(b) (1) In addition to a sanction imposed under subsection (a) of this section,
the Board may impose a penalty not exceeding $5,000 for:
(i) each violation for which a denial, reprimand, suspension, or
revocation was imposed under subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) each failure to meet or continue to meet the qualifications or
requirements set forth in this subtitle.
(2) To determine the amount of the penalty imposed under this subsection,
the Board shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the harm caused by the violation;
(iii) the good faith of the permit holder or the applicant; and
(iv) any history of previous violations by the [permit holder or the
applicant] INDIVIDUAL AGAINST WHOM THE ACTION IS CONTEMPLATED.
(c) The Board shall pay any penalty collected under subsection (b) of this section
into the General Fund of the State.
9–414.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE BOARD, the Board may reinstate:
(1) a permit that has been revoked; or
– 17 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) before fulfillment of the conditions of the suspension, a permit that has
been suspended.
9–501.
Before a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect issues to a client or submits
to a public authority any final drawing, plan, specification, report, or other document, the
[licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect who prepared or approved the document
shall sign, seal, and date the document.
9–602.
Except for a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect who operates a business
as a sole practitioner, a person may not operate a business through which landscape
architecture is practiced unless:
(1) the business is a corporation, partnership, or limited liability company;
and
(2) the corporation, partnership, or limited liability company holds a
permit issued by the Board.
9–603.
Unless authorized under this title to practice landscape architecture, a person may
not represent to the public, by use of a title, including “landscape architect”,
“PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECT”, or “licensed landscape architect”, by
description of services, methods, or procedures, or otherwise, that the person is authorized
to practice landscape architecture in the State.
9–604.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and unless a person holds a permit
issued by the Board, the person may not represent to the public, by the use of a title,
including “landscape architects”, “PROFESSIONAL LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTS”, “licensed
landscape architects”, or “registered landscape architects”, by the use of the term
“landscape architecture”, by description of services, methods, or procedures, or otherwise,
that the person holds a permit or otherwise is authorized to operate a business through
which landscape architecture is practiced in the State.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL
landscape architect who operates the business as a sole practitioner.
9–701.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 224
This title may be cited as the “Maryland PROFESSIONAL Landscape Architects Act”.
Article – Business Regulation
2–106.1.
(a) This section applies to the following occupational and professional licensing
boards:
(3) the State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL Landscape
Architects established under Title 9 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article;
2–108.
(a) The following units are in the Department:
(17) the State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL Landscape
Architects.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–2C–01.
(c) “Licensed professional” means:
(3) A PROFESSIONAL landscape architect licensed under Title 9 of the
Business Occupations and Professions Article;
Article – Environment
4–308.
(a) Anne Arundel County or the City of Annapolis may issue a grading or building
permit within the Severn River Watershed only after the developer submits a plan of
development approved by the soil conservation district. If the development plan contains
any septic or private sewer facility, the Department of the Environment shall approve it
only if the facility will not contribute in any way to pollution of the Severn River. The
developer shall submit a certificate from a professional engineer, a professional land
surveyor, or a [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect stating that the developer’s
plan to control silt and erosion is adequate to contain the silt and erosion on the property
covered by the plan. Also, the developer shall submit another certificate stating that any
construction or development will be done according to the plan. A subdivision developer
shall obtain approval of the plan at the time of approving and recording of the subdivision
plat. In addition to any other penalty provided in this subtitle, if a developer violates his
certificate, then every permit issued pursuant to the certificate is void.
– 19 –

Ch. 224 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Article – Natural Resources
5–1604.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) and (3) of this section, after December
31, 1992, or after the date on which a local program has been adopted under § 5–1603 of
this subtitle, whichever occurs first, a person making application for subdivision or grading
or sediment control permits on areas greater than 40,000 square feet shall submit a forest
stand delineation for the entire site prepared by a licensed forester, [licensed]
PROFESSIONAL landscape architect, or other qualified professionals that may be approved
by the State or a local authority in the manner required by the approved program.
5–1605.
(b) The forest conservation plan shall be developed by a licensed forester,
[licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect, or other qualified professionals that may
be approved by the State or a local authority.
Article – Public Utilities
12–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Designer” means a licensed architect, professional engineer, professional
land surveyor, or [licensed] PROFESSIONAL landscape architect, as those terms are
defined in the Business Occupations and Professions Article, who prepares a drawing for a
project that may require excavation or demolition.
Article – State Government
8–403.
This subtitle applies only to the following governmental activities and units:
(34) Landscape Architects, State Board of [Examiners of] PROFESSIONAL
(§ 9–201 of the Business Occupations and Professions Article);
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 20 –